Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1702
Trainees; Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center; costs and expenses.

Any city or village in the State of Nebraska may pay from municipal funds the cost of training and the expenses of trainees, designated by its governing body, to attend the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center.

Laws 1957, c. 42, § 1, p. 218;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 91.